Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.271

Waiver—Certificate of waiver.

Upon granting a waiver of insurance requirements found in RCW 18.44.201, the director shall issue a certificate of waiver, which certificate shall be mailed to the escrow agent who requested the waiver.

[ 2000 c 171 s 14; 1987 c 471 s 7. Formerly RCW 18.44.390.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1987 c 471: See notes following RCW 18.44.231.